Mississippi, session 2026, SB2444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  (a)  The Mississippi State Department of Health shall conduct a study on the prevention and reduction of amputations resulting from diabetes and related complications. (b)  The study shall evaluate: (i)  The prevalence of diabetes-related amputations in this state; (ii)  The cost to the state of treatment and care associated with those amputations; (iii)  Evidence-based best practices for the prevention of diabetes-related amputations, including early detection and screening programs; (iv)  Strategies to expand access to limb-saving services, including multidisciplinary care teams, wound care, podiatry and patient education; and (v)  Opportunities for public-private partnerships to reduce the rate of amputations. (2)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi State Department of Health shall appoint a workgroup of subject-matter experts and stakeholders to assist with the study. (3)  Not later than December 1, 2026, the Mississippi State Department of Health shall submit a report on the results of the study and recommendations to the Chairs of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee and Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee Chairs and their committee members. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.